District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.13

Investigations and proceedings; powers of Mayor; enforcement through courts.

(a)

The Mayor may make necessary public or private investigations in accordance with law within or outside of the District of Columbia to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder.

(b)

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the Mayor or any officer designated by rule may administer oaths or affirmations, and upon the Mayor’s own motion or upon request of any party shall subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of material evidence.

(c)

Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to answer questions propounded by the investigating officer and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the Mayor may apply to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order compelling compliance.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 413, 23 DCR 9532b
1973 Ed., § 5-1273.
1981 Ed., § 45-1873.
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.01.